Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Offenses Related to Riot, Disorderly Conduct, Pornography, Indecency, Gangs, Corpses, or Animals.
Sec. 11.61.160.
Recruiting a gang member in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of recruiting a gang member in the first degree if the person uses or threatens the use of force against a person or property to induce a person to participate in a criminal street gang or to commit a crime on behalf of a criminal street gang.

Recruiting a gang member in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.61.165.
Recruiting a gang member in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of recruiting a gang member in the second degree if the person is 18 years of age or older and, without force or the threat of force, encourages or recruits a person who is under 18 years of age and at least three years younger than the offender to participate in a criminal street gang.

Recruiting a gang member in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.